Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-398
Nonresident; refund; when allowed.

A nonresident may, if he or she applies within ninety days from his
or her original registration date and surrenders the registration certificate
and license plates which were assigned to him or her, receive from the county
treasurer, or
the department if registration was pursuant to section 60-3,198, a refund
in the amount of fifty percent of the original license fee, fifty percent
of the motor vehicle tax imposed in section 60-3,185, and fifty percent of
the motor vehicle fee imposed in section 60-3,190, except that no refunds
shall be made on any license surrendered after the ninth month of the registration
period for which the motor vehicle or trailer was registered.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 98;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 64.